Hawaii statutes.
§342G-13 Powers and duties of the
department. In the execution of the responsibilities provided under this
chapter, the department shall:

(1) Establish and administer goals and guidelines as
provided for in this chapter;

(2) Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 and administer
the rules as provided for in this chapter;

(3) Fulfill the office of solid waste management’s
responsibilities pursuant to this chapter until the establishment of the
office;

(4) Serve as the state solid waste management agency
for compliance with the federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976
(42 United States Code section 6901 et seq.) and any other federal law
regarding solid waste; and

(5) Perform other duties as specified in this
chapter. [L 1991, c 324, pt of §2; am L 1995, c 229, §3]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next